Hawaii statutes.
§501-33
Accretion to land. An applicant for registration of land by
accretion shall prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the accretion is
natural and permanent and that the land accreted before or on May 20, 2003;
provided that:

(1) The State may register land accreted along the
ocean after May 20, 2003; and

(2) A private property owner whose eroded land has
been restored by accretion after May 20, 2003, may file an accretion claim to
regain title to the restored portion.

The applicant shall supply the office of
environmental quality control with notice of the application, for publication
in the office's periodic bulletin in compliance with section 343-3(c)(4). The
application shall not be approved unless the office of environmental quality control
has published notice in the office's periodic bulletin.

As used in this section, "permanent"
means that the accretion has been in existence for at least twenty years. The
accreted portion of the land shall be considered within the conservation district.
Land accreted after May 20, 2003, shall be public land except as otherwise
provided in this section. Prohibited uses are governed by section 183‑45.
[L 1985, c 221, §2; am L 2003, c 73, §4; am L 2012, c 56, §2]

Rules of Court

Accretion, see RLC rule 26; maps, see RLC rule 105.

Law Journals and Reviews

The Wash of the Waves: How the Stroke of a Pen
Recharacterized Accreted Lands as Public Property. 34 UH L. Rev. 525 (2012).

Case Notes

Cited: 73 H. 297, 832 P.2d 724.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next